Maryland, session 2025, HB1138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1138*

HOUSE BILL 1138
10–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Private career school” means a privately owned and privately operated
institution of postsecondary education other than an institution of higher education that
furnishes or offers to furnish programs, whether or not requiring a payment of tuition or
fee, for the purpose of training, retraining, or upgrading individuals for gainful employment
as skilled or semiskilled workers or technicians in recognized occupations or in new and
emerging occupations.
11–212.
(A) A PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL MAY ADVERTISE AND COLLECT CONTACT
INFORMATION FOR POTENTIAL NEW STUDENTS BEFORE RECEIVING A CERTIFICATE
OF APPROVAL TO OPERATE IN THE STATE IF:
(1) THE PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL HAS:
(I) COMPLETED A MARKET SURVEY;
(II) SECURED A LEASE OR OWNS A PROPERTY FOR THE SCHOOL
BUILDING;
(III) COMPLETED ANY NECESSARY CONSTRUCTION,
RENOVATIONS, OR MODIFICATIONS TO THE SCHOOL BUILDING; AND
(IV) OBTAINED ALL EQUIPMENT AND PERMITS, EXCEPT FOR THE
CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL, NECESSARY FOR OPERATING THE PRIVATE CAREER
SCHOOL;
(2) THE PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL IS LIKELY TO BE ISSUED A
CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL FROM THE COMMISSION; AND
(3) THE REQUEST TO BEGIN ADVERTISING IS APPROVED BY THE
SECRETARY.
(B) ADVERTISING FOR A PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL APPROVED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) MAY CONTAIN INFORMATION RELATING TO THE OPENING OF THE
PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL, INCLUDING THE ANTICIPATED DATE OF OPENING,
PROGRAMS OF INSTRUCTION, AND THE APPLICATION PROCESS; AND

HOUSE BILL 1138 3
(2) SHALL DISCLOSE THAT THE PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL IS
PENDING APPROVAL.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS SPECIFYING THE
PROCESS FOR APPROVAL TO ADVERTISE A PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL UNDER THIS
SECTION.
11–212.
(A) THE SECRETARY MAY APPROVE A REQUEST FROM AN APPLICANT FOR A
PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL TO ADVERTISE AND COLLECT CONTACT INFORMATION
FROM POTENTIAL NEW STUDENTS BEFORE THE PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL RECEIVES
A CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL TO OPERATE.
(B) A PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL APPROVED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL:
(I) ADVERTISE ONLY INFORMATION RELATING TO THE
OPENING OF THE PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL, INCLUDING THE ANTICIPATED DATE OF
OPENING, PROGRAMS OF INSTRUCTION, AND THE APPLICATION PROCESS; AND
(II) INCLUDE, IN ANY ADVERTISEMENT, A DISCLOSURE THAT
THE CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL TO OPERATE THE PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL IS
PENDING APPROVAL; AND
(2) MAY NOT COLLECT ANY FEES OR ENTER INTO AN ENROLLMENT
AGREEMENT WITH POTENTIAL STUDENTS.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS PROVIDING FOR THE
PROCESS TO APPROVE A PRIVATE CAREER SCHOOL TO ADVERTISE UNDER THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.